District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-1009

Right to recycle individual solid waste not limited.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 10, 36 DCR 595
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971

History

1981 Ed., § 6-3409.

Prior Codifications

For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.

Editor's Notes